Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,112
School; owner; liability; manager required.

(1) The owner of each school of cosmetology or school of esthetics shall have full responsibility for ensuring that the school is operated in compliance with all applicable laws and rules and regulations and shall be liable for any and all violations occurring in the school.

(2) Each school of cosmetology or school of esthetics shall be operated by a manager who shall be present on the premises of the school no less than thirty-five hours each week. The manager may have responsibility for the daily operation of the school or satellite classroom.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 111;

Laws 1995, LB 83, § 46;

Laws 2002, LB 241, § 42;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 37;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-3,150;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 374;

Laws 2018, LB731, § 35.